Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.35.390

Duties of president.

The president of each regional university shall have general supervision of the university and see that all laws and rules of the board of trustees are observed.

[ 1977 ex.s. c 169 s 61. Prior: 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28B.40.390; prior: 1909 c 97 p 253 s 7; RRS s 4610; prior: 1897 c 118 s 218; 1893 c 107 s 7. Formerly RCW 28B.40.390, part; 28.81.110.]

NOTES:

Severability—Nomenclature—Savings—1977 ex.s. c 169: See notes following RCW 28B.10.016.